Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Chapter 25 Credit Reporting

15-25-1.
State information agency — Reports to consumer reporting agency.

The department of administration, division of taxation, child support enforcement agency, designated as the state agency for purposes of providing consumer reporting agencies with information regarding the amount of overdue support owed by an obligor, is authorized to promulgate rules, regulations, and guidelines for the release of that information in accordance with this section. For purposes of this section, “overdue support” means a delinquency pursuant to an obligation determined under a court order, or an order of an administrative process established under the law of any state, for:

support and maintenance of a minor child, which is owed to or on behalf of the child; or

support and maintenance of the obligor’s spouse or former spouse with whom the child is living.

For purposes of this section, “consumer reporting agency” means any person which, for monetary fees, dues, or on a cooperative nonprofit basis, regularly engages in whole or in part in the practice of assembling or evaluating consumer credit information or other information on consumers for the purpose of furnishing consumer reports to third parties, and which uses any means or facility of interstate commerce for the purpose of preparing or furnishing consumer reports.

The department of administration shall provide to consumer reporting agencies information regarding the amount, if any, of overdue support owed by an obligor. The department shall not be required to provide information regarding overdue support in an individual case if the department determines that release of information is inappropriate.

The department may charge consumer reporting agencies and credit bureaus a fee not to exceed the actual cost of providing the information.

The department shall provide written notice to the absent parent ten (10) days prior to the proposed release of information to consumer reporting agencies. The notice shall state that the absent parent may contest the accuracy of information prior to release and shall state the procedures to contest the accuracy of the information.

The department shall periodically inform the consumer reporting agencies if the overdue support has been paid in full or of the amended amount of overdue support.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 17.

15-25-2.
Furnishing consumer reports to child support agency.

The department of administration, division of taxation, child support enforcement agency, is authorized to request consumer reports provided the agency certifies to the credit reporting agency in writing the following:

The consumer credit report is needed for the purpose of establishing an individual’s capacity to pay child support or determining the appropriate level of such payments;

The paternity of the consumer for the child to which the obligation relates has been established or acknowledged by the consumer in accordance with state laws which the obligation arises;

The consumer has been given at least ten (10) days prior notice, by certified mail, to the last known address, that the report will be requested and be made available to the consumer; and

The consumer credit report will be kept confidential, will be used solely for the purpose described in subdivision (1) of this section and will not be used in connection with any other civil, administrative or criminal proceeding.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 370, § 4.